Utah statutes.
17-22-29.   Notice to county jail facilities.

(1)  Before an order is entered granting visitation or correspondence between a person and a prisoner, the moving party shall provide notice to the facility administrator.

(2)  The court shall:

(a)  provide an opportunity to the facility representative to respond before the order is granted; and

(b)  consider facility policy.



Enacted by Chapter 237, 1996 General Session

